pl: Rozdzielczość ADC: 10-bitowa; 12-bitowa; 14-bitowa; 16-bitowa; 18-bitowa; 24-bitowa; 8-bitowa; Inne
sv: ADC-upplösning: 10-bitars; 12-bitars; 14-bitars; 16-bitars; 18-bitars; 24-bitars; 8-bitars; Övrigt
hu: ADC-felbontás: 10 bites; 12 bites; 14 bites; 16 bites; 18 bites; 24 bites; 8 bites; Egyéb
fi: ADC-resoluutio: 10-bittinen; 12-bittinen; 14-bittinen; 16-bittinen; 18-bittinen; 24-bittinen; 8-bittinen; Muu
pt-PT: Resolução ADC: 10 bits; 12 bits; 14 bits; 16 bits; 18 bits; 24 bits; 8 bits; Outro
es: Resolución del ADC: 10 bits; 12 bits; 14 bits; 16 bits; 18 bits; 24 bits; 8 bits; Otros
th: ความละเอียด ADC: 10 บิต; 12 บิต; 14 บิต; 16 บิต; 18 บิต; 24 บิต; 8 บิต; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Rezoluție ADC: 10 biți; 12 biți; 14 biți; 16 biți; 18 biți; 24 biți; 8 biți; Altele
ru: Разрешение АЦП: 10-битный; 12-битный; 14-битный; 16-битный; 18-битный; 24-битный; 8-битный; Другой
bg-BG: ADC резолюция: 10-битов; 12-битов; 14-битов; 16-битов; 18-битов; 24-битов; 8-битов; Други
zh-CN: ADC 分辨率: 10 位; 12 位; 14 位; 16 位; 18 位; 24 位; 8 位; 其他
vi: Độ phân giải ADC: 10-bit; 12-bit; 14-bit; 16-bit; 18-bit; 24-bit; 8-bit; Khác
ko: ADC 해상도: 10비트; 12비트; 14비트; 16비트; 18비트; 24비트; 8비트; 기타
it: Risoluzione ADC: 10 bit; 12 bit; 14 bit; 16 bit; 18 bit; 24 bit; 8 bit; Altro
hr-HR: ADC rezolucija: 10-bitni; 12-bitni; 14-bitni; 16-bitni; 18-bitni; 24-bitni; 8-bitni; Ostalo
cs: Rozlišení ADC: 10-bit; 12-bit; 14-bit; 16-bit; 18-bit; 24-bit; 8-bit; Jiné
zh-TW: ADC 解析度: 10 位元; 12 位元; 14 位元; 16 位元; 18 位元; 24 位元; 8 位元; 其他
el: Ανάλυση ADC: 10-bit; 12-bit; 14-bit; 16-bit; 18-bit; 24-bit; 8-bit; Άλλο
tr: ADC çözünürlüğü: 10 bit; 12 bit; 14 bit; 16 bit; 18 bit; 24 bit; 8 bit; Diğer
pt-BR: Resolução ADC: 10 bits; 12 bits; 14 bits; 16 bits; 18 bits; 24 bits; 8 bits; Outro
da: ADC-opløsning: 10-bit; 12-bit; 14-bit; 16-bit; 18-bit; 24-bit; 8-bit; Andet
sk-SK: Rozlíšenie ADC: 10-bitový; 12-bitový; 14-bitový; 16-bitový; 18-bitový; 24-bitový; 8-bitový; Iné
nb: ADC-oppløsning: 10-bit; 12-bit; 14-bit; 16-bit; 18-bit; 24-bit; 8-bit; Annet
nl: ADC-resolutie: 10-bit; 12-bit; 14-bit; 16-bit; 18-bit; 24-bit; 8-bit; Andere
fr: Résolution du CAN: 10 bits; 12 bits; 14 bits; 16 bits; 18 bits; 24 bits; 8 bits; Autre
sl-SI: Ločljivost ADC: 10-bitna; 12-bitna; 14-bitna; 16-bitna; 18-bitna; 24-bitna; 8-bitna; Drugo
en: ADC resolution: 10-bit; 12-bit; 14-bit; 16-bit; 18-bit; 24-bit; 8-bit; Other
ja: ADC解像度: 10ビット; 12ビット; 14ビット; 16ビット; 18ビット; 24ビット; 8ビット; その他
lt-LT: ADC skiriamoji geba: 10 bitų; 12 bitų; 14 bitų; 16 bitų; 18 bitų; 24 bitų; 8 bitų; Kita
de: ADC-Auflösung: 10-Bit; 12-Bit; 14-Bit; 16-Bit; 18-Bit; 24-Bit; 8-Bit; Sonstiges